Maryland, session 2026, HB0321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 567 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Department of the Environment, in consultation with the Synthetic Turf
Council and other representatives of the synthetic turf industry, local environmental and
community stakeholders, and synthetic turf producers, retailers, and users, including local
governments, county school systems, higher education facilities, and professional sports
organizations, shall conduct a study on:
(1) synthetic turf;
(2) existing synthetic turf fields in the State; and
(3) the synthetic turf industry in the State.
(b) On or before [July 1, 2026] JANUARY 15, 2027, the Department shall submit
a report of its findings to the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the
Environment and the House Environment and Transportation Committee, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(c) The report required under subsection (b) of this section shall include:
(1) industry information and background;
(2) methodologies used for data collection, including public hearings and
other public outreach;
– 1 –

Ch. 326 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) current industry practices and guidelines relating to the sale,
maintenance, reuse, and disposal of synthetic turf;
(4) current industry disposal methods of synthetic turf, including known
locations of such disposal;
(5) proper and improper disposal methods of synthetic turf;
(6) current recycling rates and methods of synthetic turf and future
recycling proposals;
(7) factors influencing disposal and recycling;
(8) case studies and examples; and
(9) proposals for improving recycling rates and waste management.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –